North Carolina, session 2025, SB886.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of Grifton for design and
construction of flood mitigation and resiliency projects.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S886-v-1*